th: สื่อ: เอกสารวิชาการและการศึกษา; หนังสือ; นิตยสารและหนังสือพิมพ์; การบันทึกเพลงและเสียง; คอร์สเรียนออนไลน์; พอดแคสต์และสตรีมสด; ไฟล์สำหรับพิมพ์; คู่มือผลิตภัณฑ์; โน้ตเพลง; สื่อวิดีโอ
fi: Media: Akateemiset tutkielmat ja opinnot; Kirjat; Aikakaus- ja sanomalehdet; Musiikki- ja äänitetallenteet; Verkkokurssit; Podcastit ja suorat lähetykset; Tulostettavat tuotteet; Tuotemanuaalit; Nuotit; Videot
sl-SI: Mediji: Akademski članki in študije; Knjige; Revije in časopisi; Glasba in zvočni posnetki; Spletni tečaji; Poddaje in prenosi v živo; Gradiva za tiskanje; Navodila za uporabo izdelkov; Notni zapisi; Videoposnetki
ru: Медиаконтент: Научные статьи и исследования; Книги; Журналы и газеты; Музыка и звукозаписи; Онлайн-курсы; Подкасты и прямые трансляции; Материалы для печати; Руководства по эксплуатации; Ноты; Видео
zh-CN: 媒体: 学术论文与研究; 书籍; 报纸/杂志; 音乐; 在线课程; 播客/直播; 可打印文件; 产品说明书; 乐谱; 视频
pt-BR: Mídia: Artigos e estudos acadêmicos; Livros; Revistas e jornais; Gravações de músicas; Cursos online; Podcasts e transmissões ao vivo; Arquivos para impressão; Manuais de produtos; Partitura; Vídeos
vi: Truyền thông: Bài báo và nghiên cứu học thuật; Sách; Tạp chí và báo; Bản thu thanh và thu nhạc; Khóa học trực tuyến; Podcast & chương trình phát trực tiếp; Tệp có thể in; Sách hướng dẫn sử dụng sản phẩm; Bản nhạc; Video
da: Medier: Akademiske artikler og undersøgelser; Bøger; Magasiner og aviser; Musik- og lydoptagelser; Onlinekurser; Podcasts og livestreams; Print selv-filer; Produktmanualer; Nodeark; Videoer
pt-PT: Multimédia: Artigos e estudos acadêmicos; Livros; Revistas e jornais; Gravações de música e áudio; Cursos online; Podcasts e transmissões ao vivo; Imprimíveis; Manuais de produto; Partituras; Vídeos
de: Medien: Akademische Arbeiten und Studien; Bücher; Zeitschriften & Zeitungen; Musik & Tonaufnahmen; Onlinekurse; Podcasts und Live-Streams; Druckvorlagen; Produkthandbücher & Gebrauchsanleitungen; Notenblätter; Videos
en: Media: Academic Papers & Studies; Books; Magazines & Newspapers; Music & Sound Recordings; Online Courses; Podcasts & Live Streams; Printables; Product Manuals; Sheet Music; Videos
hu: Média: Akadémiai papírok és tanulmányok; Könyvek; Magazinok és újságok; Zene és hangfelvételek; Online kurzusok; Podcastok és élő közvetítések; Nyomtatható anyagok; Termékkézikönyvek; Kotta; Videók
fr: Médias: Articles et études académiques; Livres; Magazines et journaux; Musique et enregistrements audio; Cours en ligne; Podcasts et diffusions en direct; Fichiers à imprimer; Guides d’utilisation; Partitions; Vidéos
tr: Medya: Akademik Makaleler ve Çalışmalar; Kitaplar; Dergiler ve Gazeteler; Müzik ve Ses Kayıt Cihazları; Online kurslar; Podcast'ler ve Canlı Yayınlar; Yazdırılabilir ürünler; Ürün Kullanım Kılavuzları; Nota Kağıtları; Videolar
it: Media: Paper e studi accademici; Libri; Riviste e giornali; Registrazioni di musica e suoni; Corsi online; Podcast e live streaming; File stampabili; Manuali prodotti; Musica su partitura; Video
zh-TW: 媒體: 學術論文/研究; 書籍; 雜誌/報紙; 唱片/卡帶/錄製品; 線上課程; Podcast/直播; 可列印檔案; 產品使用手冊; 樂譜; 影片
nl: Media: Academische artikelen en onderzoeken; Boeken; Tijdschriften en kranten; Muziek- en geluidsopnamen; Online cursussen; Podcasts en livestreams; Printables; Producthandleidingen; Bladmuziek; Video's
ko: 미디어: 학술 논문/연구; 도서; 잡지/신문; 음악/사운드 녹음; 온라인 강의; 팟캐스트/라이브 스트리밍; 인쇄용 파일; 제품 설명서; 악보; 비디오
pl: Media: Artykuły i badania akademickie; Książki; Gazety i czasopisma; Nagrania muzyczne i dźwiękowe; Kursy online; Podkasty i transmisje na żywo; Materiały do druku; Instrukcje obsługi; Nuty; Filmy
el: Μέσα ενημέρωσης: Ακαδημαϊκές εργασίες & μελέτες; Βιβλία; Περιοδικά & εφημερίδες; Μουσική & ηχογραφήσεις; Διαδικτυακά μαθήματα; Podcasts και ζωντανές ροές; Εκτυπώσιμα; Εγχειρίδια προϊόντος; Μουσική παρτιτούρα; Βίντεο
ja: メディア: 学術論文&研究; 書籍; 新聞・雑誌; 音楽メディア; オンラインコース; ポッドキャスト・ライブストリーム; プリンタブル; 製品マニュアル; 楽譜; 動画
nb: Medier: Akademiske artikler og studier; Bøker; Magasiner og aviser; Musikk- og lydopptak; Nettkurs; Podkaster og direktesendinger; Utskriftsklare filer; Produktmanualer; Noteark; Videoer
sv: Media: Akademiska uppsatser och studier; Böcker; Tidningar och tidskrifter; Musik- och ljudinspelning; Onlinekurser; Podcaster och liveströmmar; Utskrivbart material; Produkthandböcker; Musiknoter; Videor
hr-HR: Mediji: Akademski radovi i studije; Knjige; Časopisi i novine; Glazba i zvučne snimke; Mrežni tečajevi; Podcasti i prijenosi uživo; Materijali za ispis; Priručnici za proizvod; Notni zapisi; Videozapisi
es: Multimedia: Artículos y estudios académicos; Libros; Revistas y periódicos; Música y grabaciones; Cursos online; Podcasts y transmisiones en directo; Imprimibles; Manuales de productos; Partituras; Vídeos
lt-LT: Medija: Akademiniai straipsniai ir tyrimai; Knygos; Žurnalai ir laikraščiai; Muzika ir garso įrašai; Internetiniai kursai; Tinklalaidės ir tiesioginės transliacijos; Spausdinami failai; Gaminių vadovai; Muzikinės natos; Vaizdo įrašai
ro-RO: Media: Lucrări și studii academice; Cărți; Reviste și ziare; Muzică și înregistrări audio; Cursuri online; Podcasturi și transmisiuni live; Materiale imprimabile; Manuale pentru produse; Partituri; Videoclipuri
bg-BG: Медия: Научни статии и проучвания; Книги; Списания и вестници; Музика и звукозаписи; Онлайн курсове; Подкасти и потоци на живо; Материали за печат; Ръководства за продукти; Партитури; Видеоклипове
cs: Média: Akademické práce a studie; Knihy; Noviny a časopisy; Záznam hudby a zvuku; Online kurzy; Podcasty a živé streamy; Materiály k tisku; Produktové manuály; Noty; Videa
sk-SK: Médiá: Akademické práce a štúdie; Knihy; Časopisy a noviny; Hudobné a zvukové nahrávky; Online kurzy; Podcasty a živé prenosy; Materiály na tlač; Príručky k produktom; Partitúra; Videá